Project Gutenberg's The Tale of Benny Badger, by Arthur Scott Bailey

This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere at no cost and with
almost no restrictions whatsoever.  You may copy it, give it away or
re-use it under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included
with this eBook or online at www.gutenberg.net


Title: The Tale of Benny Badger

Author: Arthur Scott Bailey

Illustrator: Harry L. Smith

Release Date: February 13, 2008 [EBook #24589]

Language: English


*** START OF THIS PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK THE TALE OF BENNY BADGER ***




Produced by Joe Longo, Emmy and the Online Distributed
Proofreading Team at http://www.pgdp.net











THE TALE OF BENNY BADGER




_SLEEPY-TIME TALES_

(Trademark Registered)

BY ARTHUR SCOTT BAILEY

AUTHOR OF _TUCK-ME-IN TALES_

(Trademark Registered)


        THE TALE OF CUFFY BEAR
        THE TALE OF FRISKY SQUIRREL
        THE TALE OF TOMMY FOX
        THE TALE OF FATTY COON
        THE TALE OF BILLY WOODCHUCK
        THE TALE OF JIMMY RABBIT
        THE TALE OF PETER MINK
        THE TALE OF SANDY CHIPMUNK
        THE TALE OF BROWNIE BEAVER
        THE TALE OF PADDY MUSKRAT
        THE TALE OF FERDINAND FROG
        THE TALE OF DICKIE DEER MOUSE
        THE TALE OF TIMOTHY TURTLE
        THE TALE OF MAJOR MONKEY
        THE TALE OF BENNY BADGER

[Illustration: Benny doesn't like Mr. Coyote's singing.]




_SLEEPY-TIME TALES_ (Trademark Registered)


THE TALE OF BENNY BADGER

BY

ARTHUR SCOTT BAILEY

        Author of
        "TUCK-ME-IN TALES"
        (Trademark Registered)

        ILLUSTRATED BY
        HARRY L. SMITH


        NEW YORK
        GROSSET & DUNLAP
        PUBLISHERS
        Made in the United States of America

        COPYRIGHT, 1919, BY
        GROSSET & DUNLAP




CONTENTS

CHAPTER                                     PAGE

      I  A GREAT DIGGER                       1

     II  HUNTING FOR SOMETHING                7

    III  NO ONE AT HOME                      12

     IV  MR. COYOTE SINGS                    17

      V  SPEAKING OF GROUND SQUIRRELS        23

     VI  STRANGE PARTNERS                    28

    VII  MR. COYOTE REMEMBERS                32

   VIII  A WATCHER AND A WORKER              37

     IX  A CARELESS HELPER                   42

      X  THE SORE PAW                        47

     XI  BIRDS' EGGS                         51

    XII  THE PRAIRIE CHICKEN                 56

   XIII  DON'T DO THAT                       62

    XIV  A QUEER DISCOVERY                   67

     XV  BENNY AND THE OWL                   72

    XVI  SPOILING A GAME                     76

   XVII  THE PRAIRIE DOG VILLAGE             81

  XVIII  SAVING THE DAY                      86

    XIX  PLEASANT PRAISE                     90

     XX  THE RANCHER IS ANGRY                94

    XXI  THE NEW HOME                        99

   XXII  A BREAKFAST INVITATION             105

  XXIII  MR. DEER MOUSE IS TIMID            109




THE TALE OF BENNY BADGER




THE TALE OF BENNY BADGER




I

A GREAT DIGGER


Of course, Benny Badger had the best of reasons for living on the high,
dry plains. There he had for neighbors plenty of ground squirrels and
prairie dogs. And it is likely that he enjoyed their company much more
than they did his.

If anyone had asked them, those little wild people would no doubt have
confessed that they wished Benny Badger was somewhere else. But their
wishes meant nothing to Benny--if he knew anything of them. Although he
couldn't help noticing that his small neighbors hurried into their homes
whenever they caught sight of him, Benny never took the hint and went
away. On the contrary, when he spied a prairie dog or a ground squirrel
disappearing into his burrow Benny was more than ready to go right in
after him.

Now, the tunnels that led to the houses of those smaller folk were too
small to admit anybody as bulky as Benny Badger. But that difficulty
never hindered Benny. Digging was the easiest thing he did. He had a
powerful body, short, stout legs, and big feet, which bore long, strong
claws. And when he started to dig his way into somebody else's home he
certainly did make the dirt fly.

He was so fond of digging that he even dug countless holes of his own,
just for the fun it gave him--so far as anybody could find out. And if
he had only left other folk's holes alone some of his neighbors would
not have objected to his favorite sport. For more than one fox and
coyote had been known to make his home in a hole dug by Benny Badger.
And, though they never took the trouble to thank him for saving them
work, they often chuckled about his odd way of having fun, and remarked
among themselves that Benny must be a stupid fellow.

If they really thought that, they made a great mistake. To be sure, at
anything except digging he was slow and awkward. He was too heavy and
squat to be spry on his feet--to chase and catch his more nimble
neighbors. But no one that knew much about Benny Badger would have said
that his wits were dull. They were sharp. And so, too, were his teeth,
which he never hesitated to use in a fight.

Left alone, Benny Badger--when he wasn't too hungry--was a peaceable
person. But if a dog ever tried to worry him Benny had a most unpleasant
way of seizing his annoyer with his powerful jaws and holding the poor
creature as if he never intended to let him go.

Cornered, Benny knew no such thing as fear. He had the heart of a lion,
and jaws like a steel trap. And no wise dog ever let Benny get a good,
firm grip on him.

Usually no one saw Benny Badger except at night. He seldom left his den
in the daytime except to sun himself. And even then not many noticed
him. Though he did not hide when anyone surprised him while taking a
sun-bath, he had a trick of lying flat in the grass without moving. And
it took a sharp eye to spy him when he lay low in that fashion.

Curled up asleep, with his long fur on end, he looked too comfortable to
disturb. At least, that was what the ground squirrels thought. And if
one of those busy little fellows ever paused to stare curiously at Benny
when he was having a nap in the warm sunshine, Benny Badger had only to
awake and turn his head toward the onlooker to make him scamper for home
as fast as he could go.

It was not Benny's face, either, that frightened the ground squirrels
away, though everybody had to admit that he had a queer one. A black
patch spread over his eyes and ran like the point of a V down his nose.
For the most part, however, he was of a grayish color, with still more
black running in streaks across his back. Underneath he was a--yes! a
dirty white color. But then, one must remember that he was forever
digging in the dirt; and there was very little water where he lived.
Anyhow, he was particular enough about one thing: his long hair was
always carefully parted in the middle from his head to his tail.

And certainly that ought to show that he tried to keep himself looking
neat.




II

HUNTING FOR SOMETHING


It was a pleasant summer's night. Anyone would have supposed that it was
just the sort of weather that Benny Badger might have chosen for digging
holes. But he must have thought that he had dug enough holes for the
time being. He wandered about as if he had lost a hole somewhere and
couldn't find it. And whenever he spied a hole made by one of his
smaller neighbors he stopped and looked at it closely.

But none of them seemed to be the one he was looking for. At least,
Benny examined a good many holes, and then passed on again, before he
came to one at last that was different from all the rest. If you could
have seen the look of pleasure on Benny's odd face when he caught sight
of this particular hole you would have known at once that his search had
come to an end.

Now, as a matter of fact, Benny Badger had not lost a hole. His strange
behavior did not mean that. It meant that he was searching for a _fresh_
hole, which some ground squirrel had dug so short a time before that
there couldn't be much doubt that the small owner was then living in it.

[Illustration: Mr. Ground Squirrel Escapes from Benny.]

To be sure, Benny might have dug his way to the furthest end of each
hole that he found that night. And doubtless he would have enjoyed such
a pastime. But as for finding a plump ground squirrel at the end of
every tunnel--ah! that would have been a different matter. No such
pleasant sight would have greeted Benny's eyes. And on this evening he
wanted to find some such reward when his digging came to an end.

He knew as well as he knew anything in the world that newly scattered
earth never lay strewn about the doorway of an _old_ hole.

And that was the reason he passed by so many holes with hardly more than
a swift glance.

But when at length he found what he had been looking for--a hole with
fresh brown dirt scattered carelessly around it--Benny Badger showed by
every one of his actions that he didn't intend to move on until he had
burrowed to the very end of it.

A broad smile lighted up his queerly marked face. At least, he opened
his mouth and showed a good many of his teeth. And a bright, eager
glint came into his eyes; whereas they had had a somewhat wistful look
before, as if their owner might have been hungry, and didn't exactly
know where he was going to find a meal.

Then Benny Badger looked all around, to see whether anybody might be
watching him. But there was no one in sight. And if there had been,
Benny Badger would have done no more than tell him that he had better
run along about his business, because it would do him no good to
wait--none at all.

And if the onlooker had happened to come so near as to bother Benny in
what he intended to do, that unfortunate person might have wished that
he had taken a bit of friendly advice in time, and made himself scarce.

But, of course, Benny Badger was not so foolish as to give any such
warning, for there was no one there to hear it.




III

NO ONE AT HOME


Since there seemed to be nobody lurking in the shadows around him, and
watching him, Benny Badger turned to the ground squirrel's hole and
began to dig. How he did make the dirt fly! He scooped it up with his
big feet and flung it back in a shower, not caring in the least where it
fell. For he was interested not in what lay behind, but before him.

In almost less time than it takes to tell about it, Benny Badger had
made the entrance of the tunnel so big that it swallowed his head and
shoulders.

Now, when some people do anything they are forever stopping to see how
much they have finished, as if they hated to work and wished that they
didn't have to. But Benny Badger was not like them. He loved to dig. And
instead of wishing that it wasn't far to the ground squirrel's chamber
he kept hoping that it was a good, long tunnel, so that he might have
plenty of fun digging his way to the end of it.

_He_ didn't pause to look back at the pile of dirt he had thrown behind
him. In fact, he didn't stop for anything--not even to take a long
breath--until he noticed a sound that made him pause and listen for a
few moments.

It was a yapping, growling noise that caught Benny Badger's ear--a noise
that changed, while he listened, to a howl, and then suddenly ended as
it had begun.

That call, coming as it did out of the night, would have frightened
many people. Not knowing just what it was, they might have thought it
sounded like the cry of a wolf. But Benny Badger showed not the least
sign of fear. On the contrary, he seemed almost angry with himself
because he had stopped even for a few moments to listen.

"Oh, fudge!" he said--or something a good deal like that. "It's nothing
but a Coyote."

And then he went to digging faster than ever, to make up for lost time.

He hadn't been working long after that when Mr. Coyote's call made him
back out of the hole and listen once more.

"Shucks!" said Benny Badger--or something like that, anyhow. "He's
coming this way."

Anyone could have seen that Benny Badger was not pleased. But he
continued his work just the same. And he made the dirt fly even more
furiously than before, because he wanted to reach the end of the ground
squirrel's tunnel before Mr. Coyote arrived on the scene.

It happened that Mr. Coyote was stalking slowly across the country in
the moonlight, headed for no place in particular. So Benny Badger had
time to burrow his way to the ground squirrel's bedroom without being
interrupted.

And then Benny met with a sad disappointment. The owner of the burrow
was not at home! Benny knew that he could not have been gone long,
because the bed of dried grasses was still warm.

It was plain that Mr. Ground Squirrel had awakened and heard the sound
of Benny Badger's digging. And there was no doubt that he had sprung up
in a hurry and rushed out of his back door, while Benny made his way
through the front one.

Benny Badger tried to console himself with the thought that anyhow he
had had the fun of digging. But he was very hungry. And there was no
supper in sight anywhere.

He was just about to renew his search for fresh ground squirrels' holes,
when who should appear but Mr. Coyote himself, with a knowing smile upon
his narrow face.




IV

MR. COYOTE SINGS


Benny Badger was not at all glad to see Mr. Coyote. And after Benny's
ill luck, the smile upon Mr. Coyote's face made the disappointed digger
feel almost peevish.

"What a beautiful evening it is!" said Mr. Coyote. "And what a fine
night for digging!"

Benny Badger glared at the newcomer, making no attempt to hide his
displeasure at seeing him.

"I don't notice _you_ doing any digging," he remarked with a sneer. He
had no use for Mr. Coyote, and he did not mind letting that tricky
fellow know it, either.

But Mr. Coyote was not one to take a hint. If he knew he wasn't wanted
anywhere, it never made the slightest difference to him. And when Benny
as much as told him that he was _too lazy_ to dig a hole, Mr. Coyote did
not lose his temper even for a moment.

"No--I seldom dig," he replied. "I don't want to spoil your fun. If I
went to work and dug and dug anywhere and everywhere there'd soon be
nothing but holes, no matter where you went. You'd have no place to dig
a hole yourself. And then you'd be pretty unhappy."

Benny Badger hadn't thought of that. And he didn't know just what to
say, because if Mr. Coyote meant what he said, Benny wanted to say
something _pleasant_; and if Mr. Coyote was only joking, Benny wanted
to say something disagreeable. But before Benny had made up his mind how
to reply to Mr. Coyote's remark, his noisy friend began talking again.

"Besides," Mr. Coyote added, "I haven't time for digging, because I have
to practice singing. . . . If you don't mind, I'll practice a song right
now."

And without waiting to find out whether Benny Badger did mind or not,
Mr. Coyote began singing in the harshest of voices:


THE COYOTE'S SONG

   When Mr. Sun has gone to bed to seek his needed rest,
     And Mr. Moon has climbed the skies to flood the plains with light,
   And Mrs. Wind blows softly from the foothills in the west,
     I love to sing my _yip-ky, oodle-doodle_ in the night.

   When morning comes I hurry home, to take my daily nap;
     But when the spooky shadows fall and all the world is dark,
   Oh! then's the time I'm wide awake and ready with a _yap_,
     A happy, yappy _yip-ky, oodle-doodle_, and a bark.

   And none that hears my lovely voice, when startled from a dream,
     Will soon forget how I begin my chorus with a growl;
   Nor how I quickly run the scale, to end it with a scream,
     A happy, yappy _yip-ky, oodle-doodle_, and a howl.

   Let them that do not know my ways cry fearfully for help,
     And shake and shiver when they hear my loud and lusty call;
   While I will merely jeer at them with something like a yelp,
     A happy, yappy _yip-ky, oodle-doodle_, and a squall.

   And now I will explain to you--perhaps you've guessed before
     The lesson that I always strive with might and main to teach--
   If you would frighten timid folk, alarm them with a roar,
     A happy, yappy, _yip-ky, oodle-doodle_, and a screech.

"How do you like that?" Mr. Coyote asked with a grin, when he had
finished.

"Not very well!" said Benny Badger.

Mr. Coyote looked just the least bit crestfallen.

"Perhaps I haven't practiced the song as much as I should," he remarked.
And thereupon he started to sing it again.

But Benny Badger stopped him quickly.

"Don't!" he cried. And he held his paws, dirty as they were, over his
ears, as if he couldn't bear to hear that song another time.

Mr. Coyote smiled agreeably.

"I see," he said easily. "You don't enjoy music as I do. But I believe
we have one taste in common."

"What's that?" Benny Badger asked him; for in spite of his paws being
over his ears, he heard what Mr. Coyote said. "What's that?"

"Ground Squirrels!" Mr. Coyote replied, licking his chops as he spoke.




V

SPEAKING OF GROUND SQUIRRELS


Benny Badger stared none too pleasantly at Mr. Coyote. He didn't like
his visitor. And he wished Mr. Coyote would go away.

But Mr. Coyote seemed to be in no hurry to leave. On the contrary, he
appeared to have plenty of time to spare. And if he noticed the frown on
Benny Badger's face, he certainly acted as if it were the most agreeable
of smiles.

"We were speaking of Ground Squirrels----" he began with a smirk.

Benny Badger interrupted him quickly.

"We were not!" he snapped. "I haven't _mentioned_ Ground Squirrels," he
growled.

Mr. Coyote fell back a few steps.

"Well, I know you're _interested_ in them, anyhow," he continued, trying
to act as if he were quite unruffled by Benny's rudeness. "You can't
deny that, for unless I'm mistaken, you've just caught one here." And
his bright eyes twinkled, for he thought he "had" Benny Badger there,
and it would be of no use for Benny to deny it.

"You are mistaken," Benny Badger grunted.

At that Mr. Coyote shot a swift look at him. Was that a shadow of
disappointment about Benny's mouth?

"Did he get away from you?" Mr. Coyote inquired.

Benny Badger had to admit that that was exactly the case. He explained
how he had found the Ground Squirrel's bed warm, but empty, when he
reached the snug bedroom.

"I don't see how it happened," he told Mr. Coyote mournfully.

That crafty fellow gave a short laugh. He rather believed he knew where
the trouble lay. And he said to himself--under his breath--that Benny
Badger was even more stupid than he had supposed.

"Did you keep an eye on the Ground Squirrel's back door?" he inquired.
And he was so amused by something or other that he began to giggle.

Benny Badger was afraid that Mr. Coyote was going to burst into song
again. And he couldn't help shuddering.

"Are you going to sing?" he asked hastily.

"I hadn't intended to," Mr. Coyote answered. "But of course if you want
me to----"

"No! no!" Benny cried. "Please don't!"

"Very well!" his musical friend replied. And then he returned to his
question. "What about the back door? Did you watch it carefully?" he
inquired.

"How could I?" Benny demanded, with a snort of anger. "I can't dig away
at a Ground Squirrel's hole, with my head buried in it, and watch his
back door at the same time. If I stopped digging, and went around to the
back door, he'd be almost sure to run out through the front one. So I'd
be no better off. In fact, I'd be worse off; for I'd lose not only the
Ground Squirrel, but the fun of digging, too."

Mr. Coyote turned his head away and smiled a wide, wide smile. It was
some moments before he could trust himself to speak without laughing
right in Benny Badger's face.

"It's plain," he said at last, "that you need help. So I'm coming here
every night to assist you in the business of catching Ground
Squirrels."




VI

STRANGE PARTNERS


Mr. Coyote's plan for helping him catch Ground Squirrels did not please
Benny Badger in the least. Up to that time he had always had fair luck
hunting alone. And he said as much to Mr. Coyote, in none too friendly a
tone.

Though Benny thought he had made his feelings plain enough, it seemed as
if Mr. Coyote couldn't take a hint. So far was he from guessing that
Benny did not care for his scheme that he even suggested that it might
be a good idea if he brought a half dozen of his brothers along with
him. He was very cheerful about the whole affair--was Mr. Coyote.
Indeed, he appeared quite ready to arrange Benny Badger's business,
without ever a "By your leave," or "If you don't mind."

But Benny Badger was no person to stand quietly by and let a scamp like
Mr. Coyote spoil his whole life. He shook his head in a most obstinate
fashion, giving his visitor fair warning not to go too far.

"For goodness' sake, don't bring any of your brothers here!" Benny
Badger shouted. "I never could stand a crowd of your relations. It's bad
enough to have to listen to your six brothers when they're half a mile
away."

Mr. Coyote took no offence at that remark.

"Very well!" he replied. "No doubt they'd want to sing if they came here
to help you. And certainly their singing would interfere with your
digging--for of course you'd want to stop and listen to it."

Benny Badger's only comment sounded somewhat like "Humph!" But Mr.
Coyote must have thought that Benny agreed with him. At least, he nodded
his head. And he went on to say that he would be glad to help Benny
alone, without calling on his brothers.

Benny Badger made no further objection. To be sure, having one of the
Coyote family with him every night would be bad enough. But it was so
much better than having seven of them that he began to feel almost
pleased. Perhaps he was lucky, after all! And besides, he thought that
when Mr. Coyote came to help him catch Ground Squirrels that
good-for-nothing scamp would soon tire of digging.

And then a terrible uproar broke the silence. It sounded as if a
hundred wolves--or maybe a thousand dogs--had fallen to quarreling a
mile away, growling and howling in the distance.

As soon as he heard the noise Mr. Coyote pricked up his ears and sprang
to his feet. "I must leave you now," he said. "There are my six
brothers! They're going to have a sing. And I promised that I'd join
them. . . . Don't forget!" he added, as he flung a sly smile in Benny
Badger's direction. "I'll be here soon after dark to-morrow night."

And the next moment he was gone.

Benny Badger stood and watched him as he loped off across the moonlit
plain. And not long afterward a terrific racket--twice as loud as the
one before--made Benny bury his head in the place where he had been
digging.

"Mr. Coyote has joined his six brothers," he said to himself.




VII

MR. COYOTE REMEMBERS


The next evening, just at dusk, Benny Badger left his den and set forth
on his usual nightly ramble.

By way of exercise, and for the sake of the fun it gave him, and to
improve his appetite, he dug a few holes. And by the time it was dark he
was hungry as a bear and ready to look once more for fresh holes made by
Ground Squirrels.

He had decided not to wait for Mr. Coyote to join him, before beginning
his search. And he even hoped that Mr. Coyote had forgotten all about
his promise to meet him and help him hunt.

But Benny Badger was to have no such good fortune as that. It was not
long before he heard Mr. Coyote calling to him. And though he made no
answer, thinking that Mr. Coyote might not be able to find him, in a few
minutes that sharp-faced gentleman came bounding up at top speed.

"Here I am!" he cried, as soon as he spied Benny Badger. "I see you
started out without waiting for me. You didn't think I'd disappoint you,
did you?"

"I was afraid you wouldn't," Benny answered--a remark that Mr. Coyote
seemed not to understand. For a moment or two he looked somewhat
puzzled. But he decided, evidently, that Benny _meant_ to be pleasant,
but didn't know how to be.

"Now, then," Mr. Coyote said, while Benny Badger shuddered at his harsh
voice, "now then, where do you think we'd better look for a hole?"

"For pity's sake, don't howl so loud!" Benny Badger besought him.
"You'll waken all the Ground Squirrels in the neighborhood if you're so
noisy."

"Pardon me!" said Mr. Coyote very meekly, lowering his voice, but
promptly raising it again. "Do you know of any fresh holes around here?"

Benny Badger said that he didn't.

"Then you'd better hunt for one at once," Mr. Coyote declared, sitting
down on his haunches as if he hadn't the slightest notion of doing any
of the searching himself. "While you're looking, I'll sing a little
song," he announced.

"You needn't trouble yourself to do that," Benny Badger told him
hastily.

"Oh, it's no trouble at all, I assure you," Mr. Coyote replied.

"Well--don't you do it, anyhow," Benny warned him. "If you sing, you'll
spoil everything, because I shall not be able to look for any hole."

"I see," said Mr. Coyote, looking more than pleased. "You'd want to stop
and listen to me, of course."

"It's not that," Benny Badger corrected him. "I may as well tell you
that I don't like your songs at all."

"I have some that you've never heard," Mr. Coyote explained.

"I don't want to hear them," Benny Badger informed him. "I may as well
tell you that your songs drive me almost crazy."

It would not have been surprising if Mr. Coyote had flown into a great
rage. But he did not. Instead, he pretended to wipe a tear away from
each of his eyes. "It's a pity"--he sighed--"it's a pity that you don't
understand music. Some time I will teach you to sing--with the help of
my six brothers."

Benny Badger showed no joy over that promise. But he felt relieved when
Mr. Coyote agreed not to sing that night. And then Benny set out alone
to look for a fresh Ground Squirrel's hole, leaving Mr. Coyote with his
face hidden in his pocket-handkerchief.




VIII

A WATCHER AND A WORKER


Benny Badger searched for some time before he found a Ground Squirrel's
hole that looked as if its owner had finished it only a day or two
before.

The place was so far from the spot where Benny had left Mr. Coyote that
he did not believe he could call loudly enough for his helper to hear
him.

For a few moments Benny thought that perhaps he ought to go back and
tell Mr. Coyote that he had found a good place to dig. But he soon
changed his mind.

"I'll just begin digging and say nothing," he remarked to himself. "And
perhaps I can catch this Ground Squirrel without Mr. Coyote's help."

So he set to work. But he hadn't dug very far into the hole before he
heard Mr. Coyote's voice close behind him. That sly fellow had been
following him all the time.

"I hope the owner of this hole is at home," Mr. Coyote ventured.

At those words Benny Badger backed out of the hole and turned around.

"I'll let you dig a while," he said generously.

Mr. Coyote thanked him. But he answered that he couldn't think of
accepting Benny Badger's offer.

"I know you would be disappointed not to do the digging yourself," he
explained. "And besides, you're a better digger than I am. So I'll let
you tear this tunnel open, while I go around to the back door and
watch. . . . You know, I have a very sharp eye."

Benny Badger looked at Mr. Coyote narrowly. It occurred to him that
_both_ Mr. Coyote's eyes were very sharp. Furthermore, his nose was
sharp, too. And so were his teeth. Yes! on the whole, Benny thought, Mr.
Coyote appeared to be an exceedingly sharp person.

"Very well!" Benny told him at last. "I'll do the digging, gladly--for I
need the practice that it will give me. You see, I haven't dug more than
a half-dozen holes to-night."

Then he thrust his head into the opening he had already made. But before
he had begun to throw more dirt behind him he pulled his head out again
and called to his helper, who had moved a few steps away.

"If the Ground Squirrel comes out through his back door, please call me
at once!" he cried.

Mr. Coyote nodded his head over his shoulder and smiled.

"I will," he agreed. "And I'll ask you not to forget to dig hard,
because you know I'll be watching hard. And it wouldn't be fair for one
of us to do less work than the other."

Benny Badger replied that in his opinion Mr. Coyote's statement was in
every way reasonable.

And then he began to dig.

Benny would have made better time had he not stopped every few minutes
to listen; for he did not want to miss hearing Mr. Coyote's call.

But his ears caught nothing more than a chuckle from the spot where Mr.
Coyote sat on his haunches in the grass, watching.

[Illustration: Mr. Owl greets Benny very coldly.]

"I can stand his chuckling--if only he won't sing!" Benny said to
himself.




IX

A CARELESS HELPER


Stopping often to listen, Benny Badger did not reach the Ground
Squirrel's chamber half as quickly as he could have had he done nothing
but dig.

And when he thrust his nose into the underground bedroom he found nobody
at home. The Ground Squirrel had fled, leaving his nest so warm that
Benny Badger knew he could not have been gone long.

Benny turned away. But he was not so disappointed as he might have been,
for he remembered that Mr. Coyote was watching the back door. And
certainly no Ground Squirrel could escape his sharp eyes.

Hurrying as fast as his short legs would carry him, Benny joined Mr.
Coyote, who still sat comfortably on his haunches.

To Benny's surprise, his helper's eyes were closed, instead of being
fixed on the Ground Squirrel's back door.

"Have you seen anything of the Ground Squirrel?" Benny demanded
anxiously.

Mr. Coyote started, and opened his eyes.

"Somebody came out a few moments ago," he replied. "But he disappeared
in no time."

"That's too bad!" Benny Badger wailed. "He got away!"

"Are you sure?" Mr. Coyote inquired.

"Why, yes!" Benny cried. "It's as plain as the nose on your face."

"I won't dispute you," said Mr. Coyote.

"You'd better not!" Benny Badger snapped. "You have been very careless.
I don't believe you watched carefully enough. When I came up just now
you had your eyes shut."

"I won't dispute you," said Mr. Coyote again. He was most polite--so
polite, in fact, that Benny Badger was ashamed to appear rude or
quarrelsome.

But Benny couldn't help being disappointed over losing the Ground
Squirrel. And when, after he had dug to the end of three more tunnels
that night, the same accident happened three times more, he decided that
something would have to be done. It was clear that Mr. Coyote's eyes
were not sharp enough. He was not nearly so helpful as Benny had
expected him to be. "We'll have to change about," Benny announced at
last. "You must dig, while I watch."

But Mr. Coyote promptly made a number of objections to that plan. He
said, with something quite like a sneer, that he had much sharper eyes
than any member of the Badger family that ever lived, and that he was
quicker than a hundred Badgers put together. And as if he hadn't given
reasons enough for disagreeing with Benny, he declared that he simply
couldn't do any digging that night because he had a sore paw.

To prove his statement, Mr. Coyote held up one of his paws for Benny to
see.

Benny looked at it. He couldn't discover that it was any different from
Mr. Coyote's three remaining paws. And he had just started to say so,
too, when Mr. Coyote interrupted him with an enormous yawn.

"I'm getting sleepy," Mr. Coyote remarked. "It will be daylight before
we know it. And I'm going home to take a nap."

So saying, he sprang up and stretched himself. And then he trotted off.
But he stopped before he had gone far and looked back at Benny Badger.

"I'll be on hand to help you again after sunset," he said.




X

THE SORE PAW


Sure enough! Just as Mr. Coyote had promised, he was on hand the next
night to "help" Benny Badger catch Ground Squirrels.

Benny regarded Mr. Coyote somewhat coldly, as the two met in the
moonlight.

"How's your sore paw?" he asked Mr. Coyote.

Now, Mr. Coyote had just come trotting up without the least sign of
lameness. But all at once he began to limp.

"My poor paw's no better," he told Benny, as a look of pain crossed his
face.

"Let me see it!" Benny said.

And Mr. Coyote promptly held out one of his paws.

Benny Badger snorted. He seemed quite disgusted.

"This is not the same paw you showed me last night," he cried.

"My mistake!" said Mr. Coyote easily. And he pulled back that paw and
thrust forth another.

Benny Badger bent over it for a moment.

"It _looks_ all right," he grumbled.

"I can't help that," Mr. Coyote snarled. "It couldn't hurt me any more,
no matter what happened to it."

To Mr. Coyote's surprise, Benny Badger seized his paw in his powerful
jaws and held it in a viselike grip.

"Ouch!" Mr. Coyote wailed, pulling back quickly--a move which only
caused him greater pain.

"Your paw doesn't feel any worse, does it?" Benny Badger asked him as
well as he could, with his mouth so full.

"Yes, it does!" Mr. Coyote howled.

"Then you must have been mistaken when you said what you did only a
moment ago," Benny told him.

"I must have been," Mr. Coyote admitted. . . . "Let me go!" he begged.

But Benny Badger's jaws only closed the tighter.

"I'll bite you if you don't stop that!" Mr. Coyote threatened.

"My skin is very, very tough," Benny said. "And I can hurt you much more
than this if I want to."

Mr. Coyote believed what Benny told him. So he made no more threats, but
began to whine piteously.

"If you'll let me go I'll do anything you say," he promised.

"Will you agree to keep away from me?" Benny Badger asked him.

"Yes! Yes!" Mr. Coyote cried. "I promise!"

"Good!" said Benny Badger. "I don't need your 'help,' as you call it,
any longer. And if you ever come near me again when I'm hunting for
Ground Squirrels, I'll----"

Benny Badger never finished what he was saying, because he let go of Mr.
Coyote just then. And the moment Mr. Coyote felt himself free he leaped
away and tore off on three legs as if he were in a terrible hurry to get
somewhere else.

"Much help I'd ever get from him!" Benny Badger grumbled to himself.
"He's too lazy to dig. But he isn't too lazy to grab the Ground
Squirrels that somebody else drives out for him."




XI

BIRDS' EGGS


Though Benny Badger never cared much for foxes, he was willing, usually,
to stop and talk with one of that family--provided he wasn't too busy
digging to take the time for gossip.

There was one fox who often strolled about the neighborhood. And though
Benny had many a chat with this gentleman, somehow Benny never learned
much from him.

He was so sly that he let Benny do most of the talking, while he
listened. And when he did say anything, he preferred to ask questions.

In time Benny Badger noticed that his chats with Mr. Fox were very
one-sided. And he made up his mind at last that when he next met that
crafty fellow he would ask him plenty of questions. He would make him
talk, or he would know the reason why.

It happened that early on the following morning, when he was hunting for
Ground Squirrel's holes, he found himself face to face with Mr. Fox. And
Benny noticed that Mr. Fox was himself looking with great interest at a
fresh Ground Squirrel's hole. "Hullo!" Benny Badger exclaimed. "I hope
you haven't come here after Ground Squirrels."

Mr. Fox looked much surprised.

"No, indeed!" he said. "I'm only hunting for birds' eggs."

"Birds' eggs!" Benny Badger repeated. "Have you found any?"

Mr. Fox squirmed a bit. He did not like to answer questions.

"Have you found any eggs?" Benny asked him again.

"A few!" Mr. Fox replied.

"Where?" Benny inquired.

"Oh, in different places," said Mr. Fox. And he began to talk about the
weather--how dry it was, and how much the country needed rain.

But Benny Badger was not to be fooled so easily.

"You haven't really answered my question," Benny reminded Mr. Fox
bluntly. "I asked you where you've been finding birds' eggs. And I'll
thank you to tell me, sir."

Mr. Fox gave a slight start. Benny's tone was none too pleasant. And Mr.
Fox certainly didn't want to quarrel with him.

"If you wish to know anything about birds' eggs, why don't you ask a
Prairie Chicken?" he inquired. "She would know a great deal more about
eggs than I do."

To Benny, that suggestion seemed quite worth while. There was no doubt
that what Mr. Fox said was true. And Benny wondered why he hadn't
thought of the plan himself.

"Your advice," he told Mr. Fox, "is so good that I'm going to start
right now to look for a Prairie Chicken. It's almost dawn now. And the
Chickens will soon be getting up."

So Benny said good-by. And Mr. Fox tried to say good-by, too; but
somehow he choked over the words, and began to cough so violently that
Benny Badger was quite alarmed.

He waited anxiously until he saw that Mr. Fox was out of danger. And
then he left him.

If he had looked back he might have seen his sly friend capering about
in the gray light as if something amused him hugely. And no doubt Benny
would have wondered what it could have been.

"Prairie Chickens!" Mr. Fox was chuckling. "Much they'll tell _him_
about eggs!"




XII

THE PRAIRIE CHICKEN


After he left Mr. Fox, Benny Badger hurried here and there and
everywhere in search of a prairie chicken.

He found one, after a time. But the lady wouldn't stop to talk with him.
The moment she spied Benny she _whirred_ into the air and flew off,
though she certainly must have heard him calling to her.

But at last, just as red streaks began to shoot up in the eastern sky,
Benny caught sight of a stately dame who was so busy catching
grasshoppers for her breakfast that she hadn't noticed him.

He did not dare go too near her, for fear of scaring her. So he called
to her in as gentle a tone as he could, saying, "Don't be alarmed,
madam! I only want to ask you a question."

The prairie chicken stretched her neck as high as she was able, and
looked all around.

"Here I am!" Benny sang out from a grassy hummock.

The startled lady saw that he was not near enough to be dangerous. So
she asked him, with a proud air, what his question might be.

"I'm interested in birds' eggs," Benny explained. "Have you any, madam?"

The prairie chicken took a few steps towards him, in a very grand
manner.

"Yes, indeed!" she answered. "I have a baker's dozen! They are the most
beautiful eggs I've ever seen--though perhaps I shouldn't say so. . . .
They're speckled with brownish specks," she continued.

"How interesting!" Benny Badger exclaimed. "I must have a look at those
eggs. Where is your nest, madam?"

And just then the prairie chicken did a strange thing. Without a word of
warning she sprang into the air and sailed away, leaving Benny Badger to
gaze after her, and wonder why she hadn't answered his question.

He soon made up his mind that he would find her nest, anyhow.

Now, since there wasn't a tree anywhere in the neighborhood, Benny felt
quite sure that the lady's nest must be on the ground. And since he knew
that all prairie chickens slept at night, he waited until dark before he
began his search, for he wanted to find Mrs. Prairie Chicken at home
when he called on her.

So when night came once more, Benny Badger left his den and went forth
on his errand.

He had gone only a short distance when he met his old friend Mr. Fox,
who had told him a little--and very little, too--about eggs. "Are you
having any luck to-night?" Benny Badger inquired.

"What do you mean?" Mr. Fox asked him.

"Have you found any eggs?" Benny questioned.

Mr. Fox said something that might have been either "Yes" or "No." Benny
was not quite sure which it was. But since Mr. Fox shook his head, he
decided that it must be "No."

"I think we're too late," Mr. Fox remarked. "The eggs must have all
hatched by this time."

Benny Badger hastened to set Mr. Fox right.

"That can't be possible," he replied. "I met Mrs. Prairie Chicken this
morning and she told me she had a baker's dozen of eggs in her nest."

"You must be mistaken about that," Mr. Fox assured him. "Where did you
say her nest is?"

"I didn't say," Benny answered.

"No, of course not!" Mr. Fox corrected himself. "What I meant was, where
did Mrs. Prairie Chicken say it is?"

"She didn't say," replied Benny Badger.

"That's unfortunate," Mr. Fox told him. "It would have saved us a good
deal of trouble if she had explained where she lives."

Then he told Benny Badger to go home, and not to trouble himself any
more. "_I_ will hunt for the old lady's nest," Mr. Fox declared.

Benny Badger couldn't help thinking that Mr. Fox was a very kind person.
And he went away feeling that it was very fine to have a friend like
him.

But after a while he began to wonder if he wasn't mistaken; for he
happened to remember that Mr. Fox hadn't said a single word about
letting him know when he had found the nest with the thirteen eggs in
it.




XIII

DON'T DO THAT!


Benny Badger turned in his tracks and went straight back to the place
where he had left Mr. Fox.

But Mr. Fox was nowhere to be seen.

So Benny began asking everybody he met if he had caught a glimpse of Mr.
Fox that night. First he asked a white-footed deer mouse, who pointed
behind him and said that he had just seen Mr. Fox "over there." Then
Benny put his question to a frightened prairie dog, who claimed that he
had noticed Mr. Fox "over there," as he pointed in a direction exactly
opposite. And still another reported that he had noticed Mr. Fox in an
entirely different place.

"That's odd!" Benny Badger said to himself. "How can he be in three
places at once?" And since he could not answer that question, he decided
to look in none of those three directions, but to try a fourth, because
he felt sure that none of the three could be the right one. And besides,
if Mr. Fox had really been where he was said to have been seen, he was
such a roving fellow that he would have moved on.

Well, where he looked next, Benny found Mr. Fox.

"What luck?" Benny asked that wily gentleman once more.

Mr. Fox replied somewhat stiffly that he had nothing to say.

"What's that on your mouth?" Benny Badger demanded suddenly.

Mr. Fox hastily rubbed his paw across his mouth.

"It can't be egg," he blurted.

"_Egg!_" Benny Badger shouted. "I hadn't mentioned _egg_! But now that
_you_ mention _egg_, perhaps that's it."

Mr. Fox looked most ill at ease. But he made no reply.

"What's that clinging to your shoulder?" asked Benny Badger abruptly.

"It can't be a feather," said Mr. Fox, nervously brushing off his
shoulder as he spoke.

"A feather!" Benny Badger exclaimed. "I've said nothing about a
_feather_! But now that you speak of it, Mr. Fox, perhaps that's it."

Mr. Fox looked very, very uncomfortable. And he murmured something about
"having to be on his way."

"Wait a moment!" said Benny, as Mr. Fox turned aside. "What's that on
the back of your neck?"

Mr. Fox tried in vain to look at the back of his own neck.

"It can't be----" he began.

But before he could finish, Benny Badger interrupted him.

"Yes, it is!" he cried. "It's my teeth!"

And so saying, he seized Mr. Fox on the back of his neck and began to
drag him over the grass.

It became clear, at once, that Mr. Fox did not enjoy the sport.

"Don't do that, friend!" he begged. "What are you trying to do, anyhow?"

"I'm trying to rub the egg off your mouth," Benny Badger explained.

"Please don't trouble yourself," said Mr. Fox.

Then Benny began to shake him.

"Don't do that, friend!" said Mr. Fox again. "What are you trying to
do?"

"I'm only trying to shake the feather off you," Benny told him.

"Don't trouble yourself," said Mr. Fox. "If you'll take those teeth off
my neck, that's all I'll ask of you."

"Not yet!" Benny Badger replied grimly. "You're a robber. And I'm going
to teach you a lesson. . . . You _will_ rob birds' nests, will you?"

To his great surprise, Mr. Fox began to laugh.

"Why, you'd rob them yourself if you weren't so clumsy!" he cried.
"You're really no better than I am."

Benny Badger hadn't thought of that. And the idea surprised him so much
that his mouth fell open. And of course Mr. Fox at once leaped aside and
ran off.




XIV

A QUEER DISCOVERY


No one would ever have called Benny Badger a great traveller. He was
altogether too heavy to roam far from home upon his short legs. So it
often happened that he did not know all that went on in the
neighborhood.

Of course, his watchful eyes took in almost everything that was in sight
of his den. But as for what was taking place just beyond the next rise,
that was an entirely different matter. Unless somebody chanced to stop
and gossip with Benny, sometimes several days would pass before he knew
what his neighbors were doing.

Luckily, Benny Badger kept his ears open, when he was awake.

And often he kept them half-open when he lay half-asleep, stretched out
in the grass not too far from his den, enjoying a sun-bath.

One day when he was sunning himself the sound of voices snatched him out
of his drowsiness. And he kept quite still, to see what he could see,
and hear what he could hear.

Soon three coyotes came sneaking through the grass, talking in hushed
voices--a thing they seldom did. Benny could hardly believe his own
ears, because he had supposed that if the coyote family spoke at all,
they always howled.

But if the quietness of the coyotes surprised Benny, what they said
astonished him a great deal more. For Benny Badger learned that the
three cronies were headed for a prairie dog village just beyond the
next rise.

That was most amazing news. Benny Badger hadn't known that there was a
prairie dog village so near his den. And for a moment he was tempted to
call to the coyotes and ask them if what they said was really true or if
they were only fooling.

But he didn't think the three prowlers had seen him. So there seemed to
be no reason for their saying what wasn't so.

Well, the moment they disappeared, Benny Badger jumped up and hurried
into his den. He would have followed the coyotes, but he decided it
would be better to wait. The prairie dogs would be too wary, with those
coyotes in their village.

But later, after the coyotes had left--ah! then he would pay a visit to
the village himself.

Towards evening Benny Badger crept out of his den and followed the trail
of the three coyotes. And sure enough! when he reached the top of the
rise he saw the mounds of the prairie dogs spread out before him.

Though he saw no prairie dogs, he noticed an owl sitting upon a heap of
earth that had been tossed out around a hole.

Benny Badger strolled up to the owl.

"It's a fine evening!" said Benny.

The owl merely stared at him, round-eyed, and made no reply.

"I say, it's a fine evening!" Benny repeated in a louder tone.

"Very well!" the owl replied. "You may say it as often as you wish. I'm
sure I have no objection. . . . But you don't need to come any nearer,"
he added.

Benny Badger stopped and squatted in the grass. He was glad to rest, for
he was--as has been said--no great traveller.

"Is anybody at home?" he asked presently.

"Somebody is," said the owl.

"Then I'll dig right in as soon as I get my breath," said Benny Badger,
glancing at the hole.

"Do you want to see somebody?" the owl asked. "For if you do, there's no
need of your doing any digging here."

"Why not?" Benny inquired.

"I'm somebody," the owl informed him. "I live here; and I'll be
disgusted if you go to tearing my house to pieces."




XV

BENNY AND THE OWL


Benny Badger smiled at the owl. He thought he must be fooling.

"You're a joker, aren't you?" said Benny. "But I never should have
thought it--you look so glum."

The owl seemed somewhat displeased.

"I've never made a joke yet," he declared, "though I've no doubt I
could, if I should ever want to."

Benny Badger glanced from the owl to the hole, and then back again at
the strange fellow.

"You don't mean to say you live here, in this hole?" Benny exclaimed.

[Illustration: Benny Seized Mr. Coyote's Paw.]

"Certainly; I do," the owl replied sharply.

Benny Badger couldn't understand how that could be.

"But this is a prairie dog house," he protested. . . . "Where's the
chap that built it? He must be around here somewhere."

"I don't know where he is, and I don't care where he is," the owl
answered. "I drove him out of this house because I wanted to live here
myself. And I didn't trouble myself to see where he went."

Benny Badger could hardly believe what the owl told him. But he noticed
that the fellow had a sharp beak, and sharp claws too.

"I should think you played a joke on the prairie dog," he remarked at
last.

"Should you?" said the owl. "If it _was_ a joke, it wasn't nearly as
big a one as I'll play on anybody that tries to drive _me_ away from
here. . . . I drove a snake away yesterday," he added. And he looked
very thoughtfully at Benny Badger, as if he were picking out a soft
place in which to sink his cruel beak.

"You needn't be so touchy," said Benny. "I'm not going to disturb you.
I'm sure I shouldn't care to live in your house."

The owl was a peppery fellow. He grew angry at once.

"Why not?" he demanded. "What's the matter with my house?"

"I'll tell you," Benny replied. "It's a second-hand one. And that's bad
enough. But it would be still worse if I took it away from you, because
then it would be third-hand."

The owl looked daggers at him.

"You've insulted me!" he cried loudly, swelling himself up--or so it
seemed.

"Have I?" Benny Badger inquired. "Don't mention it! I'm sure you're
quite welcome." To tell the truth, he had not the least idea what the
owl meant.

Naturally, Benny's words only made the owl angrier than ever. And he
became actually rude.

"If I were you," he spluttered, "until I learned better manners I would
dig a hole somewhere, crawl inside it, and pull it in after me."

Now, that was a new idea--for Benny Badger. And he liked it.

"What fun that would be!" he exclaimed. "Then when I wanted to go out
I'd have to dig my way again!"

The owl gave a queer cry. And looking quite discouraged, he flew off and
left Benny Badger sitting there in the grass.




XVI

SPOILING A GAME


Though the owl left him in such a rude fashion, Benny Badger wasted no
time in thinking about what had just happened. There was something far
more worth while that claimed his thoughts. For the prairie dog village
still remained where it had been. And as Benny looked at it he found it
highly interesting.

Even as he glanced at the doorway of the nearest house he caught sight
of a small head with bulging eyes, which stared at him without blinking.

Benny moved nearer. And the head promptly vanished.

Then Benny Badger smiled all over his face.

"Ah!" he exclaimed. "Here's somebody else at home!" And he looked all
around at a number of other doorways. To his great delight he saw other
eyes peeping at him.

"There's a lot of 'em at home!" Benny cried with great glee.

He never felt happier in all his life. Everything was exactly as he
would have wished it. And he was just taking off his coat, and trying to
decide where he would begin to dig, when something happened that made
him look very peevish. And he slipped his coat on again, and lay flat in
the grass.

A coyote had come bounding up at exactly the wrong time! And every one
of the prairie dogs promptly pulled his head out of sight.

If he noticed Benny at all, the coyote must have thought him no more
than a heap of dirt. Anyhow, he paid no heed to Benny, but went stalking
through the village with his tongue hanging out of his mouth, looking
sharply out of the corners of his eyes at the houses he passed.

There is no denying that Benny Badger was displeased. He wanted no
sneaking coyote at hand to spoil his plans. And he was all ready to
growl, when something made him change his mind and close his mouth.

The coyote walked through the village and disappeared in the distance.
And here and there heads soon began to appear in doorways.

But when Benny Badger stood up and drew nearer to them, they dropped
down again.

The next moment a very angry lady rushed up and began scolding Benny
Badger at the top of her voice. It was Mrs. Coyote. "Go away from this
village!" she shrieked. "You're spoiling our hunting!"

"Whose hunting?" Benny Badger asked her.

"Mine and my husband's!" she snapped. "That was my husband that passed
by here a few minutes ago. Of course we know the Prairie Dogs will all
hide when they see him. But they're so silly that they're sure to bob up
and stare at him after he has gone along. And then"--she said--"then's
the time I dash up and grab them."

Mrs. Coyote paused and glared at Benny Badger. "You've spoiled my game,"
she said. "You went and showed yourself. And when they saw you, the
Prairie Dogs hid again."

Benny Badger looked at Mrs. Coyote pleasantly enough.

"Why don't you dig for them?" he asked.

But Mrs. Coyote didn't appear to care for that idea in the least. She
threatened Benny Badger with dreadful things, if he didn't leave at
once. And then she hurried on to find her husband.

Benny Badger was glad to see her go. He was not at all afraid either of
Mr. or Mrs. Coyote--nor of both of them together. And though he had
spoiled their game, he hardly thought that they would be able to spoil
his.




XVII

THE PRAIRIE DOG VILLAGE


Having once found his way to the prairie dog village, Benny Badger often
visited it.

And it is said, by those who know, that while he was there he always had
a much pleasanter time than the villagers themselves.

So little did the prairie dogs enjoy Benny Badger's society that
whenever one of them spied Benny nearing the settlement he never failed
to jerk his tail up and down and call out the news.

At the sound of the alarm--a high-pitched chatter--every prairie dog
who wasn't at home scurried for his hole as fast as he could scamper.

Benny Badger always had to smile when he saw the villagers tumbling
through their doorways. They couldn't have done anything that would have
suited him better. Had there been a single one among the prairie dogs
that wasn't a dunce he would have run _away_ from his hole, outside the
village, to hide somewhere until Benny Badger left the place.

But the prairie dogs were too stupid to think of such a trick. They knew
no better than to rush into their houses--which was exactly what Benny
Badger wanted them to do.

And if anything happened now and then to make matters specially
unpleasant for the prairie dogs, it never troubled Benny Badger. He
seemed to grow fatter and happier than ever as time passed.

But at last he heard a bit of news one day that made him feel quite
glum.

A young deer mouse claimed to have overheard a rancher talking--the
rancher that lived about a mile from Benny Badger's home. And the deer
mouse reported that the man was going to get rid of the whole prairie
dog family. "He says they eat too much grass, and dig too many holes,"
the deer mouse declared.

Though the news upset Benny, and quite took away his appetite, for a few
moments, he began to cast about for a way to prevent such a sad affair.
If you could have seen him with a worried look on his face, anxiously
asking everybody he met to give him advice, you would have thought that
he felt very, very sorry for the prairie dogs.

But such was not the case at all. Benny Badger was feeling sorry for
himself; for he knew that if the rancher drove the villagers away he
would miss them terribly. Benny had almost given up hope of finding a
way to put an end to the rancher's plan when the deer mouse told him
another bit of news.

"He's going to build a new fence out this way--the rancher is!" the deer
mouse informed Benny. "It's coming this side of the Prairie Dog village.
And that's why the rancher wants to get rid of the Prairie Dogs."

"How do you know this?" Benny Badger asked his small friend. "Have you
been eavesdropping again?"

The deer mouse blushed. And since he made no reply, Benny Badger had to
believe him.

Still, Benny could see no way out of his difficulty. And he went home at
day-break feeling quite out of sorts.

But when he awoke, right in the middle of the day, a happy thought
popped into his head.

He was so excited by it that he couldn't go to sleep again, though the
sun was shining brightly.




XVIII

SAVING THE DAY


Benny Badger kept his bright idea to himself. But his neighbors knew
that he must have thought of something, because he seemed so
good-natured all at once.

"He has a secret," they told one another. But they couldn't find out
what it was. Though they asked Benny Badger point blank what he intended
to do, he refused to tell them. He only smiled, and looked very wise.
And indeed he felt just as wise as he looked.

For a time a good many of his friends spied upon him. Hidden behind
whatever was handy, they watched Benny Badger.

But they soon grew tired of that. So far as they could see, he did
nothing but dig holes. And certainly that was nothing new for him. So
his friends went about their own affairs, leaving Benny to dig as many
holes as he pleased.

Now, it pleased him to dig more holes, and bigger holes, than he had
ever dug before. And he dug them all on the _other_ side of the prairie
dog village--on the side toward the rancher's home.

Benny seemed to have no fixed plan as to _how_ he should dig the
holes--whether in a straight row, or in a circle, or any other way. His
one idea seemed to be to dig a plenty--to dig as many as anybody could
possibly want for any purpose whatsoever.

Now and then some passer-by would stop and look at Benny for a few
minutes, and snicker.

"Are you looking for buried gold?" Mr. Coyote asked him.

"What's the matter--have you been digging so fast that you can't stop?"
Mr. Fox inquired.

Even the prairie dogs--timid as they were--ventured to jeer at Benny
Badger and demanded whether he had gone crazy. But Benny Badger never
paused to answer anybody. He smiled a good deal, however, as if he knew
something that nobody else suspected.

Every morning at dawn he went home to rest. And every evening at sunset
he returned to the same place, just beyond the prairie dog village, to
take up his work where he had left it.

The only remark Benny would make when anyone insisted on talking with
him was that he couldn't waste his time gossiping, because _he had to
save the day_.

That seemed a strange statement. No one knew exactly what Benny Badger
meant by it. To be sure, he saved each day for sleeping--for he worked
only at night. But it was just as true that he saved each night for
working. So it was only natural that people should be puzzled.

To everybody's surprise, Benny stopped his work as suddenly as he had
begun it. Exactly at midnight he paused, brushed the dirt off himself,
and slipped into his coat, remarking that he thought he "had saved the
day."

With a hungry look on his face he turned toward the prairie dog village.
And there was a great scurrying then.

"You ought to thank me!" Benny Badger called to the prairie dogs as they
dived into their holes. "I've saved the day! The rancher certainly won't
try to get rid of you now."




XIX

PLEASANT PRAISE


Not one of the prairie dogs knew what Benny Badger meant when he cried
that he "had saved the day."

Of course, they had heard that the rancher did not like their village,
and that he wanted to get rid of it--and them. But they couldn't imagine
how Benny Badger might be able to help them. Indeed, they rather liked
the rancher better than Benny, anyhow. And as for thanking Benny, the
only time they would ever feel like thanking him would be when he bade
them good-by and left the neighborhood, to return no more.

But Benny Badger was quite unaware of all that. He complained that the
prairie dogs weren't treating him well.

"They ought to send a committee to my house to thank me for what I've
done for them," he grumbled. "No one around here seems to understand me.
But the rancher certainly will. You'll see before long that he'll be
after me, to tell me what _he_ thinks of me."

For several days afterward Benny lost a good deal of sleep by staying
outside his house while watching for the rancher to appear. And little
by little, from things he said now and then, his neighbors learned his
secret.

They discovered that Benny Badger had been digging holes for the posts
of the new fence that the rancher was going to build!

"When he finds those holes already made, he won't be so foolish as to
dig others," Benny explained.

"But you've gone and dug them on the wrong side of the Prairie Dog
village!" somebody objected.

"Of course I have!" Benny retorted. "I did that on purpose. Don't you
understand that when the rancher finds the holes he'll use them where
they are? You don't suppose--do you?--that he'll be so silly as to move
the holes?"

The objector--a somewhat youthful coyote--slunk away with a foolish
simper. He saw that Benny Badger knew what he was talking about.

"Since the Prairie Dogs' village will lie _outside_ the new fence, the
rancher won't pay any more attention to it," Benny Badger said stoutly.
"From this time on, the Prairie Dogs are quite safe--so far as the
rancher is concerned. . . . And that's how I have saved the day."

Benny Badger's secret was out at last. And as fast as people learned it
they stopped to tell him that they had known all the time that he had a
fine plan of some sort, and that if there was anything they could do to
help him they would be greatly obliged if he would "count on them."

Of course the work was all done. But perhaps Benny's neighbors hadn't
stopped to think of that. Anyhow he had never known them to be so
pleasant before. And he quite enjoyed their praise; for everyone told
him that nobody had ever suspected that he was so clever.

It was lucky that Benny took the time when he did to listen to his
neighbors' pleasant speeches. Unfortunately they soon came to a sudden
end.




XX

THE RANCHER IS ANGRY


Benny Badger lay motionless, with his long hair parted along the middle
of his back and flowing off his sides in such a fashion that a careless
passer-by would not have noticed that it was anything more than dry
grass.

For several days Benny had been watching for the rancher. And now, at
last, he saw him coming, riding on a horse over the rolling plain.

There was another man with the rancher. And as soon as Benny caught the
murmur of their voices he made ready to hear many pleasant remarks about
himself. He was only waiting until the riders should discover the holes
he had dug near the prairie dog village.

Nearer and nearer came the men. And Benny Badger crouched lower and
lower.

They had passed him, and ridden a bit nearer the village, when the
rancher suddenly pulled his horse to a stand.

"Ah!" Benny Badger exclaimed under his breath. "He sees the new
post-holes that I've dug for him. And how pleased he'll be!"

It was true that the rancher had just noticed the holes for the first
time. The moment he saw them he gave a great roar.

"A badger!" he shouted. "We'll have to trap him. I can't have him
tearing my ranch up like this. These holes are the finest things in the
world to break a critter's leg in."

Benny Badger could scarcely believe what his own ears told him. He
thought there must be a mistake somewhere. And when the rancher declared
that the badger that dug those holes was worse than a whole village of
prairie dogs, Benny was tempted, for one wild moment, to dash up to the
men and tell them exactly what he thought.

But he remembered, in time, what the rancher had just said about
trapping him. And he never stirred until the two riders had moved along.

When they had ridden beyond the next rise Benny Badger made a rush for
his hole. And there he stayed all the rest of that day.

He didn't quite know what to do. And a little later he felt more
uncomfortable than ever when the rancher began to build his new fence
around the prairie dog village, without using a single one of the
post-holes that Benny had dug for him.

All Benny's neighbors noticed what was happening. And they no longer
told Benny what a clever fellow he was. On the contrary, they laughed
slyly, and said things to one another whenever Benny Badger came near
them.

When he growled at them they always pretended to be surprised to see
him, and asked him if he had "dug any post-holes lately."

But Benny Badger never answered that question. Every time he heard it he
felt like moving away from the neighborhood. And when he came home early
one morning and found a _trap_ right in his doorway he made up his mind
then and there that matters had gone far enough.

He turned away. And without stopping to tell anybody what he intended to
do, or where he was going--without even saying good-by--he stole away
across the plains to hunt for a new home.




XXI

THE NEW HOME


When Benny Badger went wandering off to find a safer and pleasanter
neighborhood in which to make a new home for himself, he had no idea at
all as to where he should go. He only knew that he wanted to get a good,
long distance away from the place where he had been living.

Wherever he decided to settle, it must be some spot where the ungrateful
rancher wouldn't be likely to find him, and set a trap in his doorway
again.

On and on Benny travelled, until at last he met a spry young chap--one
of the deer mouse family--who stopped still and stared at Benny as if
he would like to speak to him, but didn't quite dare to.

"Hullo!" said Benny Badger. "Do you live around here?"

The deer mouse answered politely with a nod, as if he would like to
talk, if he weren't too shy.

"Do you find this an agreeable neighborhood?" Benny Badger inquired.

"Very!" the deer mouse replied in a thin, piping voice.

"Is there plenty of good water nearby?" Benny asked him.

"Yes, indeed!" the deer mouse exclaimed. "There's a water-hole right
over there!" And he pointed over his shoulder, without taking his eyes
off Benny Badger. He knew it was safer to keep a close watch of
strangers.

Benny sat down. He had journeyed a long way and he was tired.

"I'll go and have a drink as soon as I'm rested," he said. "I'm glad
there's good water here. This seems to be a pleasant place. . . . Are
there any good Gophers and Prairie Dogs in the neighborhood?"

"Oh, yes!" the deer mouse answered. "But you needn't worry about them.
They won't harm you if you mind your own affairs. I've lived here a long
time; and they haven't touched me."

"What about Owls?" Benny Badger wanted to know.

The deer mouse looked solemn all at once.

"There are a few," he admitted. "If you're thinking of settling here,
you'll have to watch sharp for them. I've had several narrow escapes."

Benny Badger smiled.

"I'd like to see the Owl that could hurt me!" he cried. "And as for
Gophers and Prairie Dogs, _I like them_. . . . This is the very place
I've been looking for. And as soon as I have rested a little longer and
had a drink of that good water I'm going to dig myself a den right where
I'm sitting now."

The deer mouse pricked up his long ears at that. To the best of his
belief, no badger had ever lived in the neighborhood before. And if the
stranger was going to dig a hole, he intended to watch him while he
worked.

"If you feel rested enough now, I'll show you the way to the
water-hole," the deer mouse said presently. He was impatient for the fun
to begin.

Benny Badger stood up.

"Lead on!" he commanded. "I'll follow." And then he yawned--for it was
already long past his usual bedtime.

The deer mouse trembled slightly as he looked into Benny's great mouth.
And he took care to keep well ahead of the stranger all the way to the
water-hole, and back again, too. But he soon forgot his fear when Benny
Badger began to dig the new den. The dirt flew in such showers as the
deer mouse had never seen in all his life--except during a cyclone.

Benny had begun to dig--as he said he should--in the exact spot where he
had sat and rested. But for one reason or another he soon changed his
mind, and started to dig a different hole a short distance from the
first one.

Soon he moved again. And after he had begun no less than five holes,
only to leave each one unfinished, the deer mouse interrupted him with a
sharp cry.

"Stop! Stop!" he begged Benny. "Please don't do that!"

Benny Badger paused and stared at him in amazement.

"What is it?" he asked. "What's the matter?"

The deer mouse was all a-flutter.

"Goodness me!" he exclaimed. "You'll have the whole neighborhood dug up
if you're not careful!"




XXII

A BREAKFAST INVITATION


For a moment or two Benny Badger looked at the deer mouse without saying
a word. He told himself that here was a country person who couldn't ever
have travelled much, or he would have known better than to make such a
remark. . . . Spoil the whole neighborhood indeed! . . . Benny's lip
twisted up in something like a sneer.

"Don't you worry!" he snorted. "I don't believe you ever saw a
first-class digger before. I'm not going to spoil the neighborhood. I'm
_improving_ it. I'm making a fine house here--probably the finest there
is for miles around."

The deer mouse appeared ashamed. Of course he didn't like to seem
stupid.

"But why do you dig in so many places?" he faltered.

"That's my way," Benny Badger told him. "As soon as I get one den well
started I think I'd rather live somewhere else. But I don't mind
beginning again because there's no better exercise than digging."

"No doubt!" the deer mouse agreed. "But I'm sure it would be much too
violent for me."

He said no more, but looked on with a puzzled air until at last Benny
Badger had actually dug in one place long enough to make a deep den.

When it was quite finished Benny Badger brushed the dirt off himself and
turned to Mr. Deer Mouse.

"Come inside and see if my new house isn't the finest one you ever
saw!" he said.

For some reason Mr. Deer Mouse did not seem eager to enter. To be sure,
he thanked Benny for the invitation, but he backed away a few steps and
said that he thought he'd better not look at the new house that morning.
"I--I haven't the time to spare," he mumbled.

Benny Badger couldn't understand that remark. The white-footed gentleman
had had plenty of time to spend while watching him dig the den. And
Benny said as much, too.

"That's exactly the point," said the deer mouse. "I've spent so much
time already that I've used it all up."

Well, Benny Badger couldn't understand that either.

"Used up all the time!" he cried scornfully. "Isn't there plenty more
where the other time came from?"

"Oh, to be sure--to be sure!" said the deer mouse, who seemed ready to
agree to anything--except to Benny's invitation. "But there is another
reason why I mustn't visit your new home this morning: I'm hungry. I
haven't had my breakfast yet."

Suddenly Benny Badger remembered that he was hungry himself.

And as he stared at plump Mr. Deer Mouse a certain idea came into his
head. And he looked Mr. Deer up and down before he spoke.

"I haven't had my breakfast either," he said at last. "I'm ready for a
good meal. Come right in and join me!"

But something made Mr. Deer Mouse say, "No, thank you!" _Joining a
badger at breakfast!_ Somehow that had a dangerous sound.




XXIII

MR. DEER MOUSE IS TIMID


Benny Badger began to lose patience with the deer mouse. He was one of
the most timid persons Benny had ever seen. And Benny was on the point
of telling him that he hadn't even the courage of a prairie dog.

But suddenly a new idea flashed into his head. He thought he knew what
was troubling Mr. Deer Mouse.

"When I asked you to join me at breakfast I didn't mean what you thought
I did," Benny announced. "You thought--didn't you?--that I meant to
breakfast on _you_."

Mr. Deer Mouse admitted faintly that he had had some such notion.

"How ridiculous!" Benny Badger cried. "Why, you're so quick that I could
chase you all day--and all night, too--without catching you. You're too
spry for me. So we might as well put such an idea out of our minds."

Benny Badger sighed as he spoke. And he couldn't help noticing, once
more, how very, very plump Mr. Deer Mouse was.

"What I meant by your joining me at a good meal was simply this," he
continued: "If you'll only stay with me, and follow me quietly wherever
I go, there's a good chance that you'll have a bone to gnaw before a
great while."

All that seemed very pleasant to the deer mouse.

"Thank you ever so much!" he murmured. "I'll be glad to accept your
invitation, so long as we aren't going to breakfast inside your new
home."

So they set out. And for a time Mr. Deer Mouse followed Benny Badger all
around the neighborhood.

Though Benny kept a sharp watch on all sides, he couldn't see
anything--or anybody--that promised a meal. And he decided at last that
he would have to make a change of some sort in his plans.

So he sat down and beckoned to Mr. Deer Mouse to move nearer.

"You go ahead of me, and I'll follow you," he said. "You're smaller than
I am, and perhaps you won't frighten the game the way I do."

Mr. Deer Mouse did not seem to care for the suggestion.

"You might make a mistake," he objected. "If I went ahead of you, you
might think that I was the game. And there might be a terrible
accident."

Benny Badger sniffed.

"Nonsense!" he cried. "If I did make such a mistake, I promise you that
I wouldn't let it happen more than once."

But the deer mouse proved to be a stubborn chap. He declined flatly to
do as Benny wanted.

"Very well!" said Benny Badger gruffly. "I'm sorry that you don't care
to make things as pleasant as possible for a newcomer. Where I used to
live, people couldn't do enough for me."

"I believe you," Mr. Deer Mouse retorted. "In fact, I've heard that a
man even set a trap for you, right in your own doorway."

Of course, that news came to Benny Badger as a great surprise. He had
had no idea that Mr. Deer Mouse knew anything about him.

"Somebody has been gossiping!" Benny Badger growled angrily. "Who told
you that?"

"Goodness me! Everybody has heard about it," Mr. Deer Mouse replied.
"Don't you know that news travels fast over the plains?"

"Does it travel as fast as I do?" Benny Badger asked him suddenly.

Before the words were out of his mouth he leaped at Mr. Deer Mouse. And
for one as heavy as he was, Benny leaped with surprising swiftness.

But quick as he was, he was too slow to catch Mr. Deer Mouse napping.
That nimble fellow seemed to melt away right beneath Benny Badger's
paws.

For one moment Benny was sure he had him. And the next moment he was
sure he hadn't.

He couldn't see his small neighbor anywhere. In fact, it was a whole
week before Benny Badger set his eyes on him again. And to Benny's
amazement, Mr. Deer Mouse was just as polite as ever. He asked Benny how
he liked his new home, and if he had found the people in the
neighborhood as pleasant as he had expected.

"My house is a fine one," Benny told him. "And I dare say the
neighborhood is as good as I could expect. Certainly there's a plenty of
Gophers and Prairie Dogs here."

"I suppose"--said Mr. Deer Mouse--"I suppose some of them join you at
breakfast every morning."

Benny Badger looked at him sharply. He was all ready to get angry. But
Mr. Deer Mouse was so polite, and seemed so respectful, that Benny was
ashamed to lose his temper.

He actually winked at Mr. Deer Mouse. And he felt more cheerful than he
had since the rancher spoke ill of him.

"I'm glad I moved," he told Mr. Deer Mouse. "This is a fine place. I'm
going to live here the rest of my life."

And he did.


THE END




SLEEPY-TIME TALES

(Trademark Registered.)

By ARTHUR SCOTT BAILEY

AUTHOR OF THE TUCK-ME-IN TALES and SLUMBER-TOWN TALES

=Colored Wrapper and Text Illustrations Drawn by HARRY L. SMITH=

This series of animal stories for children from three to eight years,
tells of the adventures of the four-footed creatures of our American
woods and fields in an amusing way, which delights small two-footed
human beings.

        THE TALE OF CUFFY BEAR
        THE TALE OF FRISKY SQUIRREL
        THE TALE OF TOMMY FOX
        THE TALE OF FATTY COON
        THE TALE OF BILLY WOODCHUCK
        THE TALE OF JIMMY RABBIT
        THE TALE OF PETER MINK
        THE TALE OF SANDY CHIPMUNK
        THE TALE OF BROWNIE BEAVER
        THE TALE OF PADDY MUSKRAT
        THE TALE OF FERDINAND FROG
        THE TALE OF DICKIE DEER MOUSE
        THE TALE OF TIMOTHY TURTLE
        THE TALE OF BENNY BADGER
        THE TALE OF MAJOR MONKEY
        THE TALE OF GRUMPY WEASEL
        THE TALE OF GRANDFATHER MOLE
        THE TALE OF MASTER MEADOW MOUSE

GROSSET & DUNLAP, PUBLISHERS, NEW YORK




TUCK-ME-IN TALES

(Trademark Registered)

By ARTHUR SCOTT BAILEY

AUTHOR OF THE SLEEPY-TIME TALES and SLUMBER-TOWN TALES

=Colored Wrapper and Text Illustrations Drawn by HARRY L. SMITH=

A delightful and unusual series of bird and insect stories for boys and
girls from three to eight years old, or thereabouts.

THE TALE OF JOLLY ROBIN

        Jolly Robin spreads happiness everywhere with
        his merry song.

THE TALE OF OLD MR. CROW

        A wise bird was Mr. Crow. He'd laugh when any
        one tried to catch him.

THE TALE OF SOLOMON OWL

        Solomon Owl looked so solemn that many people
        thought he knew everything.

THE TALE OF JASPER JAY

        Jasper Jay was very mischievous. But many of
        his neighbors liked him.

THE TALE OF RUSTY WREN

        Rusty Wren fought bravely to keep all strangers
        out of his house.

THE TALE OF DADDY LONG-LEGS

        Daddy Long-Legs could point in all directions
        at once--with his different legs.

THE TALE OF KIDDIE KATYDID

        He was a musical person and chanted all night
        during the autumn.

THE TALE OF BETSY BUTTERFLY

        Betsy spent most of her time among the flowers.

THE TALE OF BUSTER BUMBLEBEE

        Buster was clumsy and blundering, but was known
        far and wide.

THE TALE OF FREDDIE FIREFLY

        Freddie had great sport dancing in the meadow
        and flashing his light.

THE TALE OF BOBBY BOBOLINK

        Bobby had a wonderful voice and loved to sing.

THE TALE OF CHIRPY CRICKET

        Chirpy loved to stroll about after dark and
        "chirp."

THE TALE OF MRS. LADYBUG

        Mrs. Ladybug loved to find out what her
        neighbors were doing and to give them advice.

GROSSET & DUNLAP, PUBLISHERS, NEW YORK




SLUMBER-TOWN TALES

(Trademark Registered.)

By ARTHUR SCOTT BAILEY

AUTHOR OF THE SLEEPY-TIME TALES and TUCK-ME-IN TALES

=Colored Wrapper and Text Illustrations Drawn by HARRY L. SMITH=

These are fascinating stories of farmyard folk for boys and girls from
about four to eight years of age.

THE TALE OF MISS KITTY CAT

        When Mrs. Rat saw Miss Kitty Cat washing her
        face, she knew it meant rain. And she wouldn't
        let her husband leave home without his
        umbrella.

THE TALE OF HENRIETTA HEN

        Henrietta Hen was an empty-headed creature with
        strange notions. She never laid an egg without
        making a great fuss about it.

THE TALE OF THE MULEY COW

        The Muley Cow belonged to Johnnie Green. He
        often milked her; and she seldom put her foot
        in the milk pail.

THE TALE OF TURKEY PROUDFOOT

        A vain fellow was Turkey Proudfoot. He loved to
        strut about the farmyard and spread his tail,
        which he claimed was the most elegant one in
        the neighborhood.

THE TALE OF PONY TWINKLEHEELS

        Pony Twinkleheels trotted so fast you could
        scarcely tell one foot from another. Everybody
        had to step lively to get out of his way.

THE TALE OF OLD DOG SPOT

        Old dog Spot had a keen nose. He was always
        ready to chase the wild folk. And he always
        looked foolish when they got away from him.

THE TALE OF GRUNTY PIG

        Grunty pig was a great trial to his mother. He
        found it hard not to put his feet right in the
        feeding trough at meal time.

GROSSET & DUNLAP, PUBLISHERS, NEW YORK




Sleepy-Time Tales

(Trademark Registered)

By ARTHUR SCOTT BAILEY

_Wrappers and illustrations in color._

_Drawings by HARRY L. SMITH_

These little books for little people tell of the adventures of the
four-footed creatures of our American woods and fields in an amusing way
which delights small two-footed human beings; and at the same time, in
the shortcomings of Cuffy Bear and his neighbors, children are quick to
recognize their own faults and to take home the obvious lessons.




Tuck-Me-In Tales

(Trademark Registered)

By ARTHUR SCOTT BAILEY

_Wrappers and illustrations in color._

_Drawings by HARRY L. SMITH_

The stories of Jolly Robin, Old Mr. Crow and the other birds are as
unusual as they are delightful, since this is almost the first time
these feathered friends of the kiddies have appeared in print. These
bird stories, like the Sleepy-Time animal stories, are based upon actual
natural history facts, but while the youngster eagerly listens to them,
a moral foundation, of deeper importance than that in natural history,
is being laid.




Slumber-Town Tales

(Trademark Registered)

BY ARTHUR SCOTT BAILEY

_Wrappers and illustrations in color._

_Drawings by HARRY L. SMITH_

The kiddies will love these fascinating stories of Farmyard Folk, which
tell of the daily doings of Muley Cow, Old Dog Spot, and their
companions. These tales will show them that they have much in common
with Henrietta Hen and the others, and will develop in them a wholesome
respect for those good friends.

GROSSET & DUNLAP, NEW YORK

[Illustration]

       *       *       *       *       *

Transcriber's Notes:

Obvious punctuation errors repaired.

Page 34, "you do" changed to "do you" (where do you think)

Page 56, "pairie" changed to "prairie" (of a prairie chicken)





End of Project Gutenberg's The Tale of Benny Badger, by Arthur Scott Bailey

*** END OF THIS PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK THE TALE OF BENNY BADGER ***

***** This file should be named 24589.txt or 24589.zip *****
This and all associated files of various formats will be found in:
        http://www.gutenberg.org/2/4/5/8/24589/

Produced by Joe Longo, Emmy and the Online Distributed
Proofreading Team at http://www.pgdp.net


Updated editions will replace the previous one--the old editions
will be renamed.

Creating the works from public domain print editions means that no
one owns a United States copyright in these works, so the Foundation
(and you!) can copy and distribute it in the United States without
permission and without paying copyright royalties.  Special rules,
set forth in the General Terms of Use part of this license, apply to
copying and distributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works to
protect the PROJECT GUTENBERG-tm concept and trademark.  Project
Gutenberg is a registered trademark, and may not be used if you
charge for the eBooks, unless you receive specific permission.  If you
do not charge anything for copies of this eBook, complying with the
rules is very easy.  You may use this eBook for nearly any purpose
such as creation of derivative works, reports, performances and
research.  They may be modified and printed and given away--you may do
practically ANYTHING with public domain eBooks.  Redistribution is
subject to the trademark license, especially commercial
redistribution.



*** START: FULL LICENSE ***

THE FULL PROJECT GUTENBERG LICENSE
PLEASE READ THIS BEFORE YOU DISTRIBUTE OR USE THIS WORK

To protect the Project Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting the free
distribution of electronic works, by using or distributing this work
(or any other work associated in any way with the phrase "Project
Gutenberg"), you agree to comply with all the terms of the Full Project
Gutenberg-tm License (available with this file or online at
http://gutenberg.net/license).


Section 1.  General Terms of Use and Redistributing Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic works

1.A.  By reading or using any part of this Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic work, you indicate that you have read, understand, agree to
and accept all the terms of this license and intellectual property
(trademark/copyright) agreement.  If you do not agree to abide by all
the terms of this agreement, you must cease using and return or destroy
all copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in your possession.
If you paid a fee for obtaining a copy of or access to a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work and you do not agree to be bound by the
terms of this agreement, you may obtain a refund from the person or
entity to whom you paid the fee as set forth in paragraph 1.E.8.

1.B.  "Project Gutenberg" is a registered trademark.  It may only be
used on or associated in any way with an electronic work by people who
agree to be bound by the terms of this agreement.  There are a few
things that you can do with most Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works
even without complying with the full terms of this agreement.  See
paragraph 1.C below.  There are a lot of things you can do with Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works if you follow the terms of this agreement
and help preserve free future access to Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works.  See paragraph 1.E below.

1.C.  The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation ("the Foundation"
or PGLAF), owns a compilation copyright in the collection of Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works.  Nearly all the individual works in the
collection are in the public domain in the United States.  If an
individual work is in the public domain in the United States and you are
located in the United States, we do not claim a right to prevent you from
copying, distributing, performing, displaying or creating derivative
works based on the work as long as all references to Project Gutenberg
are removed.  Of course, we hope that you will support the Project
Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting free access to electronic works by
freely sharing Project Gutenberg-tm works in compliance with the terms of
this agreement for keeping the Project Gutenberg-tm name associated with
the work.  You can easily comply with the terms of this agreement by
keeping this work in the same format with its attached full Project
Gutenberg-tm License when you share it without charge with others.

1.D.  The copyright laws of the place where you are located also govern
what you can do with this work.  Copyright laws in most countries are in
a constant state of change.  If you are outside the United States, check
the laws of your country in addition to the terms of this agreement
before downloading, copying, displaying, performing, distributing or
creating derivative works based on this work or any other Project
Gutenberg-tm work.  The Foundation makes no representations concerning
the copyright status of any work in any country outside the United
States.

1.E.  Unless you have removed all references to Project Gutenberg:

1.E.1.  The following sentence, with active links to, or other immediate
access to, the full Project Gutenberg-tm License must appear prominently
whenever any copy of a Project Gutenberg-tm work (any work on which the
phrase "Project Gutenberg" appears, or with which the phrase "Project
Gutenberg" is associated) is accessed, displayed, performed, viewed,
copied or distributed:

This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere at no cost and with
almost no restrictions whatsoever.  You may copy it, give it away or
re-use it under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included
with this eBook or online at www.gutenberg.net

1.E.2.  If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is derived
from the public domain (does not contain a notice indicating that it is
posted with permission of the copyright holder), the work can be copied
and distributed to anyone in the United States without paying any fees
or charges.  If you are redistributing or providing access to a work
with the phrase "Project Gutenberg" associated with or appearing on the
work, you must comply either with the requirements of paragraphs 1.E.1
through 1.E.7 or obtain permission for the use of the work and the
Project Gutenberg-tm trademark as set forth in paragraphs 1.E.8 or
1.E.9.

1.E.3.  If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is posted
with the permission of the copyright holder, your use and distribution
must comply with both paragraphs 1.E.1 through 1.E.7 and any additional
terms imposed by the copyright holder.  Additional terms will be linked
to the Project Gutenberg-tm License for all works posted with the
permission of the copyright holder found at the beginning of this work.

1.E.4.  Do not unlink or detach or remove the full Project Gutenberg-tm
License terms from this work, or any files containing a part of this
work or any other work associated with Project Gutenberg-tm.

1.E.5.  Do not copy, display, perform, distribute or redistribute this
electronic work, or any part of this electronic work, without
prominently displaying the sentence set forth in paragraph 1.E.1 with
active links or immediate access to the full terms of the Project
Gutenberg-tm License.

1.E.6.  You may convert to and distribute this work in any binary,
compressed, marked up, nonproprietary or proprietary form, including any
word processing or hypertext form.  However, if you provide access to or
distribute copies of a Project Gutenberg-tm work in a format other than
"Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other format used in the official version
posted on the official Project Gutenberg-tm web site (www.gutenberg.net),
you must, at no additional cost, fee or expense to the user, provide a
copy, a means of exporting a copy, or a means of obtaining a copy upon
request, of the work in its original "Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other
form.  Any alternate format must include the full Project Gutenberg-tm
License as specified in paragraph 1.E.1.

1.E.7.  Do not charge a fee for access to, viewing, displaying,
performing, copying or distributing any Project Gutenberg-tm works
unless you comply with paragraph 1.E.8 or 1.E.9.

1.E.8.  You may charge a reasonable fee for copies of or providing
access to or distributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works provided
that

- You pay a royalty fee of 20% of the gross profits you derive from
     the use of Project Gutenberg-tm works calculated using the method
     you already use to calculate your applicable taxes.  The fee is
     owed to the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark, but he
     has agreed to donate royalties under this paragraph to the
     Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation.  Royalty payments
     must be paid within 60 days following each date on which you
     prepare (or are legally required to prepare) your periodic tax
     returns.  Royalty payments should be clearly marked as such and
     sent to the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation at the
     address specified in Section 4, "Information about donations to
     the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation."

- You provide a full refund of any money paid by a user who notifies
     you in writing (or by e-mail) within 30 days of receipt that s/he
     does not agree to the terms of the full Project Gutenberg-tm
     License.  You must require such a user to return or
     destroy all copies of the works possessed in a physical medium
     and discontinue all use of and all access to other copies of
     Project Gutenberg-tm works.

- You provide, in accordance with paragraph 1.F.3, a full refund of any
     money paid for a work or a replacement copy, if a defect in the
     electronic work is discovered and reported to you within 90 days
     of receipt of the work.

- You comply with all other terms of this agreement for free
     distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm works.

1.E.9.  If you wish to charge a fee or distribute a Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic work or group of works on different terms than are set
forth in this agreement, you must obtain permission in writing from
both the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation and Michael
Hart, the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark.  Contact the
Foundation as set forth in Section 3 below.

1.F.

1.F.1.  Project Gutenberg volunteers and employees expend considerable
effort to identify, do copyright research on, transcribe and proofread
public domain works in creating the Project Gutenberg-tm
collection.  Despite these efforts, Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works, and the medium on which they may be stored, may contain
"Defects," such as, but not limited to, incomplete, inaccurate or
corrupt data, transcription errors, a copyright or other intellectual
property infringement, a defective or damaged disk or other medium, a
computer virus, or computer codes that damage or cannot be read by
your equipment.

1.F.2.  LIMITED WARRANTY, DISCLAIMER OF DAMAGES - Except for the "Right
of Replacement or Refund" described in paragraph 1.F.3, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation, the owner of the Project
Gutenberg-tm trademark, and any other party distributing a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work under this agreement, disclaim all
liability to you for damages, costs and expenses, including legal
fees.  YOU AGREE THAT YOU HAVE NO REMEDIES FOR NEGLIGENCE, STRICT
LIABILITY, BREACH OF WARRANTY OR BREACH OF CONTRACT EXCEPT THOSE
PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH F3.  YOU AGREE THAT THE FOUNDATION, THE
TRADEMARK OWNER, AND ANY DISTRIBUTOR UNDER THIS AGREEMENT WILL NOT BE
LIABLE TO YOU FOR ACTUAL, DIRECT, INDIRECT, CONSEQUENTIAL, PUNITIVE OR
INCIDENTAL DAMAGES EVEN IF YOU GIVE NOTICE OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH
DAMAGE.

1.F.3.  LIMITED RIGHT OF REPLACEMENT OR REFUND - If you discover a
defect in this electronic work within 90 days of receiving it, you can
receive a refund of the money (if any) you paid for it by sending a
written explanation to the person you received the work from.  If you
received the work on a physical medium, you must return the medium with
your written explanation.  The person or entity that provided you with
the defective work may elect to provide a replacement copy in lieu of a
refund.  If you received the work electronically, the person or entity
providing it to you may choose to give you a second opportunity to
receive the work electronically in lieu of a refund.  If the second copy
is also defective, you may demand a refund in writing without further
opportunities to fix the problem.

1.F.4.  Except for the limited right of replacement or refund set forth
in paragraph 1.F.3, this work is provided to you 'AS-IS' WITH NO OTHER
WARRANTIES OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO
WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTIBILITY OR FITNESS FOR ANY PURPOSE.

1.F.5.  Some states do not allow disclaimers of certain implied
warranties or the exclusion or limitation of certain types of damages.
If any disclaimer or limitation set forth in this agreement violates the
law of the state applicable to this agreement, the agreement shall be
interpreted to make the maximum disclaimer or limitation permitted by
the applicable state law.  The invalidity or unenforceability of any
provision of this agreement shall not void the remaining provisions.

1.F.6.  INDEMNITY - You agree to indemnify and hold the Foundation, the
trademark owner, any agent or employee of the Foundation, anyone
providing copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in accordance
with this agreement, and any volunteers associated with the production,
promotion and distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works,
harmless from all liability, costs and expenses, including legal fees,
that arise directly or indirectly from any of the following which you do
or cause to occur: (a) distribution of this or any Project Gutenberg-tm
work, (b) alteration, modification, or additions or deletions to any
Project Gutenberg-tm work, and (c) any Defect you cause.


Section  2.  Information about the Mission of Project Gutenberg-tm

Project Gutenberg-tm is synonymous with the free distribution of
electronic works in formats readable by the widest variety of computers
including obsolete, old, middle-aged and new computers.  It exists
because of the efforts of hundreds of volunteers and donations from
people in all walks of life.

Volunteers and financial support to provide volunteers with the
assistance they need, is critical to reaching Project Gutenberg-tm's
goals and ensuring that the Project Gutenberg-tm collection will
remain freely available for generations to come.  In 2001, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation was created to provide a secure
and permanent future for Project Gutenberg-tm and future generations.
To learn more about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation
and how your efforts and donations can help, see Sections 3 and 4
and the Foundation web page at http://www.pglaf.org.


Section 3.  Information about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive
Foundation

The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation is a non profit
501(c)(3) educational corporation organized under the laws of the
state of Mississippi and granted tax exempt status by the Internal
Revenue Service.  The Foundation's EIN or federal tax identification
number is 64-6221541.  Its 501(c)(3) letter is posted at
http://pglaf.org/fundraising.  Contributions to the Project Gutenberg
Literary Archive Foundation are tax deductible to the full extent
permitted by U.S. federal laws and your state's laws.

The Foundation's principal office is located at 4557 Melan Dr. S.
Fairbanks, AK, 99712., but its volunteers and employees are scattered
throughout numerous locations.  Its business office is located at
809 North 1500 West, Salt Lake City, UT 84116, (801) 596-1887, email
business@pglaf.org.  Email contact links and up to date contact
information can be found at the Foundation's web site and official
page at http://pglaf.org

For additional contact information:
     Dr. Gregory B. Newby
     Chief Executive and Director
     gbnewby@pglaf.org


Section 4.  Information about Donations to the Project Gutenberg
Literary Archive Foundation

Project Gutenberg-tm depends upon and cannot survive without wide
spread public support and donations to carry out its mission of
increasing the number of public domain and licensed works that can be
freely distributed in machine readable form accessible by the widest
array of equipment including outdated equipment.  Many small donations
($1 to $5,000) are particularly important to maintaining tax exempt
status with the IRS.

The Foundation is committed to complying with the laws regulating
charities and charitable donations in all 50 states of the United
States.  Compliance requirements are not uniform and it takes a
considerable effort, much paperwork and many fees to meet and keep up
with these requirements.  We do not solicit donations in locations
where we have not received written confirmation of compliance.  To
SEND DONATIONS or determine the status of compliance for any
particular state visit http://pglaf.org

While we cannot and do not solicit contributions from states where we
have not met the solicitation requirements, we know of no prohibition
against accepting unsolicited donations from donors in such states who
approach us with offers to donate.

International donations are gratefully accepted, but we cannot make
any statements concerning tax treatment of donations received from
outside the United States.  U.S. laws alone swamp our small staff.

Please check the Project Gutenberg Web pages for current donation
methods and addresses.  Donations are accepted in a number of other
ways including including checks, online payments and credit card
donations.  To donate, please visit: http://pglaf.org/donate


Section 5.  General Information About Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works.

Professor Michael S. Hart is the originator of the Project Gutenberg-tm
concept of a library of electronic works that could be freely shared
with anyone.  For thirty years, he produced and distributed Project
Gutenberg-tm eBooks with only a loose network of volunteer support.


Project Gutenberg-tm eBooks are often created from several printed
editions, all of which are confirmed as Public Domain in the U.S.
unless a copyright notice is included.  Thus, we do not necessarily
keep eBooks in compliance with any particular paper edition.


Most people start at our Web site which has the main PG search facility:

     http://www.gutenberg.net

This Web site includes information about Project Gutenberg-tm,
including how to make donations to the Project Gutenberg Literary
Archive Foundation, how to help produce our new eBooks, and how to
subscribe to our email newsletter to hear about new eBooks.
